California statutes. Corporations Code
Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by 5 percent of the members, requesting the removal of the officer or director in question.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13291.

Except as provided in Section 13293, the removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13292.

The director or officer, against whom such charges have been brought, shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses; and the person or persons bringing the charges against him shall have the same opportunity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13293.

If the by-laws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, the petition for removal of a director shall be signed by 20 percent of the members residing in the district from which he was elected. The board of directors shall call a special meeting of the members residing in that district to consider the removal of the director; and by a vote of the majority of the members of that district, the director in question shall be removed from office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Members [13300. - 13304.]

13300.

(a) Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the by-laws, an association may admit as members, or issue common stock to, only such persons as are engaged in the production of fishery products to be handled by or through the association, including the lessees and tenants of boats and equipment used for the production of such fishery products and any lessors and landlords who receive as rent all or part of the fish produced by such leased equipment.

(b) If a member of a nonstock association is other than a natural person, such member may be represented by any individual duly authorized in writing.

(c) One association may become a member or stockholder of any other association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.

When a member of an association established without shares of stock has paid his membership fee in full, he shall receive a certificate of membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13302.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on his membership fee or his subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory note given in payment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13303.

Meetings of members shall be held at the place as provided in the by-laws; and if no provision is made, in the city where the principal place of business is located at a place designated by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13304.

In case of the expulsion of a member, and where the by-laws do not provide any procedure or penalty, the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise his property interest in the association and shall fix the amount thereof in money, which shall be paid to him within one year after such expulsion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Stock [13310. - 13316.]

13310.

No association shall issue a certificate for stock to a member until it has been fully paid for. The promissory notes of the members may be accepted by the association as full or partial payment. The association shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note; but such retention as security shall not affect the member’s right to vote. An association, in its by-laws, may limit the amount of common stock which one member may own.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13311.

One class of stock shall always be known as common stock and voting power may be restricted to holders of common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13312.

There shall be printed upon each common stock certificate a statement that the transfer thereof to any person not engaged in the production of the products handled by the association is prohibited by the by-laws of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13313.

Except as to the matters and things stated in the articles of incorporation no distinction shall exist between classes of stock or the holders thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13314.

If an association issues nonpar value stock the issuance of such stock shall be governed by the terms of the General Corporation Law covering the issuance of nonpar value stock in domestic corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13315.

An association may, at any time, as specified in the by-laws, except when the debts of the association exceed 50 percent of its assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value thereof, as conclusively determined by the board of directors and pay for it in cash within one year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13316.

Whenever an association, organized with preferred shares of stock, purchases the stock or any property, or any interest in any property of any person, it may discharge the obligations so incurred, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest, shares of its preferred stock to an amount which at par value would equal the fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case the transfer to the association of the stock or interest purchased shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers [13325. - 13335.]

13325.

An association may:

Engage in any activity in connection with the marketing, selling, preserving, harvesting, drying, processing, manufacturing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, or utilization of any fishery products produced or delivered to it by its members; or the manufacturing or marketing of the by-products thereof; or any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members of supplies, machinery, or equipment, or in the financing of any such activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13326.

An association may borrow without limitation as to amount of corporate indebtedness or liability and may make advances to members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13327.

An association may act as the agent or representative of any member or members in any of the two next preceding sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13328.

An association may establish reserves and invest the funds thereof in bonds or in such other property as may be provided in the by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13329.

An association may purchase or otherwise acquire, hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, sell, transfer, pledge, or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any corporation or association engaged in any related activity or in the warehousing or handling or marketing or packing or manufacturing or processing or preparing for market of any of the fishery products handled by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13330.

An association may buy, hold and exercise all privileges or ownership, over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of any of the business of the association, or incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13331.

An association may levy assessments in the manner and in the amount provided in its by-laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13332.

An association may do each and every thing necessary, suitable or proper for the accomplishment of any one of the purposes or the attainment of any one or more of the objects enumerated in this article; or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association; and contract accordingly; and in addition exercise and possess all powers, rights and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and, in addition, any other rights, powers and privileges granted by the laws of this State to ordinary corporations, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of this
 act; and do any such thing anywhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13333.

An association may use or employ any of its facilities for any purpose; provided, the proceeds arising from such use and employment go to reduce the cost of operation for its members; but the fishery products of nonmembers shall not be dealt in to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it for its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13334.

An association may organize, form, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own stock of, or be a member of any other corporation or corporations, with or without capital stock and engaged in preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, storing, handling, shipping, utilizing, manufacturing, marketing, or selling of the fishery products handled by the association, or the by-products thereof.

If such corporations are warehousing corporations, they may issue legal warehouse receipts to the association against the commodities delivered by it, or to any other person and such legal warehouse receipts shall be considered as adequate
 collateral to the extent of the usual and current value of the commodity represented thereby. In case such warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded under the laws of this State or the United States, its warehouse receipt delivered to the association on commodities of the association or its members, or delivered by the association or its members, shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13335.

Any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements and contracts and arrangements with any other cooperative or other corporation, association, or associations, formed in this or in any other State, for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business or any part or parts thereof. Any two or more associations may, by agreement between them, unite in employing and using or may separately employ and use the same personnel, methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Marketing Contracts [13350. - 13356.]

13350.

An association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts, requiring the members to sell, for any period of time, not over 15 years, all or any specified part of their fishery products or specified commodities exclusively to or through the association or any facilities to be created by the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.

If the members contract a sale to the association, it shall be conclusively held that title to the products passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded liens, to the association upon delivery or at any other time expressly and definitely specified in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.

The contract may provide that the association may sell or resell the fishery products delivered by its members, with or without taking title thereto; and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest on preferred stock, not exceeding 8 percent per annum, and reserves for retiring the stock, if any; and other proper reserves; and interest not exceeding 8 percent per annum upon common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13353.

The marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member to the association upon the breach by him of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of fishery products; and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses and fees, in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association; and any such provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this State; and such clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13354.

In the event of any such breach or threatened breach of such marketing contract by a member the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance thereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13355.

In any action upon such marketing agreements, it shall be conclusively presumed that a landlord or lessor is able to control the delivery of fishery products produced by his equipment by tenants, or others, whose tenancy or possession or work on such equipment or the terms of whose tenancy or possession or labor thereon were created or changed after execution by the landlord or lessor, of such a marketing agreement; and in such actions, the foregoing remedies for nondelivery or breach shall lie and be enforceable against such landlord or lessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13356.

A contract entered into by a member of an association, providing for the delivery to such association of products produced or acquired by the member, may be specifically enforced by the association to secure the delivery to it of such fishery products, any provisions contained in the Civil Code to the contrary notwithstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 4. PROFESSIONAL CORPORATIONS [13400. - 13410.]

13400.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

13401.

As used in this part:

(a) “Professional services” means any type of professional services that may be lawfully rendered only pursuant to a license, certification, or registration authorized by the Business and Professions Code, the Chiropractic Act, or the Osteopathic Act.

(b) “Professional corporation” means a corporation organized under the General Corporation Law or pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13406 that is engaged in rendering professional services in a single profession, except as otherwise authorized in Section 13401.5, pursuant to a certificate of registration issued by the governmental agency regulating the profession as herein provided and that in its practice or business designates itself as a
 professional or other corporation as may be required by statute. However, any professional corporation or foreign professional corporation rendering professional services by persons duly licensed by the Medical Board of California or any examining committee under the jurisdiction of the board, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, the Dental Hygiene Board of California, the California State Board of Pharmacy, the Veterinary Medical Board, the California Architects Board, the Court Reporters Board of California, the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board, the Board of Registered Nursing, the State Board of Optometry, or the California Board of Occupational Therapy shall not be required to obtain a certificate of registration in order to render those professional services.

(c) “Foreign professional
 corporation” means a corporation organized under the laws of a state of the United States other than this state that is engaged in a profession of a type for which there is authorization in the Business and Professions Code for the performance of professional services by a foreign professional corporation.

(d) “Licensed person” means any natural person who is duly licensed under the provisions of the Business and Professions Code, the Chiropractic Act, or the Osteopathic Act to render the same professional services as are or will be rendered by the professional corporation or foreign professional corporation of which the person is, or intends to become, an officer, director, shareholder, or employee.

(e) “Disqualified person” means a licensed person who for any reason becomes legally disqualified (temporarily or permanently) to render the professional services that the particular
 professional corporation or foreign professional corporation of which they are an officer, director, shareholder, or employee is or was rendering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 24.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13401.3.

As used in this part, “professional services” also means any type of professional services that may be lawfully rendered only pursuant to a license, certification, or registration authorized by the Yacht and Ship Brokers Act (Article 2 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13401.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 13401 and any other provision of law, the following licensed persons may be shareholders, officers, directors, or professional employees of the professional corporations designated in this section so long as the sum of all shares owned by those licensed persons does not exceed 49 percent of the total number of shares of the professional corporation so designated herein, and so long as the number of those licensed persons owning shares in the professional corporation so designated herein does not exceed the number of persons licensed by the governmental agency regulating the designated professional corporation. This section does not limit employment by a professional corporation designated in this section to only those
 licensed professionals listed under each subdivision. Any person duly licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Chiropractic Act, or the Osteopathic Act may be employed to render professional services by a professional corporation designated in this section.

(a) Medical corporation.

(1) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Registered nurses.

(4) Licensed optometrists.

(5) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(6) Licensed clinical social workers.

(7) Licensed physician assistants.

(8) Licensed chiropractors.

(9) Licensed acupuncturists.

(10) Naturopathic doctors.

(11) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(12) Licensed physical therapists.

(13) Licensed pharmacists.

(14) Licensed midwives.

(15) Licensed occupational therapists.

(b) Podiatric medical corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Registered nurses.

(4) Licensed optometrists.

(5) Licensed chiropractors.

(6) Licensed acupuncturists.

(7) Naturopathic doctors.

(8) Licensed physical therapists.

(c) Psychological corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Registered nurses.

(4) Licensed optometrists.

(5) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(6) Licensed clinical social workers.

(7) Licensed chiropractors.

(8) Licensed acupuncturists.

(9) Naturopathic doctors.

(10) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(11) Licensed midwives.

(d) Speech-language pathology corporation.

(1) Licensed audiologists.

(e) Audiology corporation.

(1) Licensed speech-language pathologists.

(f) Nursing corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Licensed psychologists.

(4) Licensed optometrists.

(5) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(6) Licensed clinical social workers.

(7) Licensed physician assistants.

(8) Licensed chiropractors.

(9) Licensed acupuncturists.

(10) Naturopathic doctors.

(11) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(12) Licensed midwives.

(g) Marriage and family therapist corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Licensed clinical social workers.

(4) Registered nurses.

(5) Licensed chiropractors.

(6) Licensed acupuncturists.

(7) Naturopathic doctors.

(8) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(9) Licensed midwives.

(h) Licensed clinical social worker corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(4) Registered nurses.

(5) Licensed chiropractors.

(6) Licensed acupuncturists.

(7) Naturopathic doctors.

(8) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(i) Physician assistants corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Registered nurses.

(3) Licensed acupuncturists.

(4) Naturopathic doctors.

(5) Licensed midwives.

(j) Optometric corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Licensed psychologists.

(4) Registered nurses.

(5) Licensed chiropractors.

(6) Licensed acupuncturists.

(7) Naturopathic doctors.

(k) Chiropractic corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Licensed psychologists.

(4) Registered nurses.

(5) Licensed optometrists.

(6) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(7) Licensed clinical social workers.

(8) Licensed acupuncturists.

(9) Naturopathic doctors.

(10) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(11) Licensed midwives.

(l) Acupuncture corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric
 medicine.

(3) Licensed psychologists.

(4) Registered nurses.

(5) Licensed optometrists.

(6) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(7) Licensed clinical social workers.

(8) Licensed physician assistants.

(9) Licensed chiropractors.

(10) Naturopathic doctors.

(11) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(12) Licensed midwives.

(m) Naturopathic doctor corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Registered nurses.

(4) Licensed physician assistants.

(5) Licensed chiropractors.

(6) Licensed acupuncturists.

(7) Licensed physical therapists.

(8) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(9) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(10) Licensed clinical social workers.

(11) Licensed optometrists.

(12) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(13) Licensed midwives.

(n) Dental corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Dental assistants.

(3) Registered dental assistants.

(4) Registered dental assistants in extended functions.

(5) Registered dental hygienists.

(6) Registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(7) Registered dental hygienists in alternative practice.

(o) Professional clinical counselor corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Licensed clinical social workers.

(4) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(5) Registered nurses.

(6) Licensed chiropractors.

(7) Licensed acupuncturists.

(8) Naturopathic doctors.

(9) Licensed midwives.

(p) Physical therapy corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Licensed acupuncturists.

(4) Naturopathic doctors.

(5) Licensed occupational therapists.

(6) Licensed speech-language therapists.

(7) Licensed audiologists.

(8) Registered nurses.

(9) Licensed psychologists.

(10) Licensed physician assistants.

(11) Licensed midwives.

(q) Registered dental hygienist in alternative practice corporation.

(1) Registered dental assistants.

(2) Licensed dentists.

(3) Registered dental hygienists.

(4) Registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(r) Licensed midwifery corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed psychologists.

(3) Registered nurses.

(4) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(5) Licensed clinical social workers.

(6) Licensed physician assistants.

(7) Licensed chiropractors.

(8) Licensed acupuncturists.

(9) Licensed naturopathic doctors.

(10) Licensed professional clinical counselors.

(11) Licensed physical therapists.

(s) Occupational therapy corporation.

(1) Licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Licensed doctors of podiatric medicine.

(3) Licensed
 acupuncturists.

(4) Naturopathic doctors.

(5) Licensed physical therapists.

(6) Licensed speech-language therapists.

(7) Licensed audiologists.

(8) Registered nurses.

(9) Licensed psychologists.

(10) Licensed physician assistants.

(11) Licensed midwives.

(12) Licensed clinical social workers.

(13) Licensed marriage and family therapists.

(14) Licensed occupational therapy assistants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 290, Sec. 7.   (AB 2671)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13402.

(a) This part shall not apply to any corporation now in existence or hereafter organized which may lawfully render professional services other than pursuant to this part, nor shall anything herein contained alter or affect any right or privilege, whether under any existing or future provision of the Business and Professions Code or otherwise, in terms permitting or not prohibiting performance of professional services through the use of any form of corporation permitted by the General Corporation Law.

(b) The conduct of a business in this state by a corporation pursuant to a license or registration issued under any state law, except laws relating to taxation, shall not be considered to be the conduct of a business as a professional corporation if the business is conducted by, and the license or registration is issued to, a corporation which is not a professional corporation within the meaning of this part, whether or not a professional corporation could conduct the same business, or portions of the same business, as a professional corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

13403.

The provisions of the General Corporation Law shall apply to professional corporations, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this part. A professional corporation which has only one shareholder need have only one director who shall be such shareholder and who shall also serve as the president and treasurer of the corporation. The other officers of the corporation in such situation need not be licensed persons. A professional corporation which has only two shareholders need have only two directors who shall be such shareholders. The two shareholders between them shall fill the offices of president, vice president, secretary and treasurer.

A professional medical corporation may establish in its articles or bylaws the manner in which its directors are selected and removed, their powers, duties, and compensation. Each term of office may not exceed three years. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the articles or bylaws of a professional medical corporation with more than 200 shareholders may provide that directors who are officers of the corporation or who are responsible for the management of all medical services at one or more medical centers may have terms of office, as directors, of up to six years; however, no more than 50 percent of the members of the board, plus one additional member of the board, may have six-year terms of office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

13404.

A corporation may be formed under the General Corporation Law or pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13406 for the purposes of qualifying as a professional corporation in the manner provided in this part and rendering professional services. The articles of incorporation of a professional corporation shall contain a specific statement that the corporation is a professional corporation within the meaning of this part. Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 13401, no professional corporation shall render professional services in this state without a currently effective certificate of registration issued by the governmental agency regulating the profession in which such corporation is or proposes to be engaged, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code or the Chiropractic Act expressly authorizing such professional services to be rendered by a professional corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 955, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13404.5.

(a) A foreign professional corporation may qualify as a foreign corporation to transact intrastate business in this state in accordance with Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1. A foreign professional corporation shall be subject to the provisions of the General Corporation Law applicable to foreign corporations, except where those provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this part. The statement and designation filed by the foreign professional corporation pursuant to Section 2105 shall contain a specific statement that the corporation is a foreign professional corporation within the meaning of this part.

(b) No foreign professional corporation shall render professional services in this state without a currently effective certificate of registration issued by the governmental agency regulating the profession in which that corporation proposes to be engaged, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code expressly authorizing those professional services to be rendered by a foreign professional corporation.

(c) If the California board, commission, or other agency that prescribes the rules or regulations governing a particular profession either now or hereafter requires that the shareholders of the professional corporation bear any degree of personal liability for the acts of the corporation, either by personal guarantee or in some other form that the governing agency prescribes, the shareholders of a foreign corporation that has been qualified to do business in this state in the same profession shall, as a condition of doing business in this state, be subject, with regard to the rendering of professional services by the professional corporation in California, or for California residents, to the same degree of personal liability, if any, as is prescribed by the governing agency for shareholders of a California professional corporation rendering services in the same profession.

(d) Each application by a foreign professional corporation to qualify to do business in this state shall contain the following statement:

“The shareholders of the undersigned foreign professional corporation shall be subject, with regard to the rendering of professional services by the professional corporation in California, or for California residents, to the same degree of personal liability, if any, in California as is from time to time prescribed by the agency governing the profession in this state for shareholders in a California professional corporation rendering services in the same profession. This application accordingly constitutes a submission to the jurisdiction of the courts of California to the same extent, but only to the same extent, as applies to the shareholders of a California professional corporation in the same profession. The foregoing submission to jurisdiction is a condition of qualification to do business in this state.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 910, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13405.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 13404, a professional corporation may lawfully render professional services in this state, but only through employees who are licensed persons. The corporation may employ persons not so licensed, but such persons shall not render any professional services rendered or to be rendered by that corporation in this state. A professional corporation may render professional services outside of this state, but only through employees who are licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the rendition of occasional professional services in another jurisdiction as an incident to the licensee’s primary practice, so long as it is permitted by the governing agency that regulates the particular profession in the jurisdiction. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the rendition of occasional professional services in this state as an incident to a professional employee’s primary practice for a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state, so long as it is permitted by the governing agency that regulates the particular profession in this state.

(b) Subject to Section 13404.5, a foreign professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state may lawfully render professional services in this state, but only through employees who are licensed persons, and shall render professional services outside of this state only through persons who are licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices. The foreign professional corporation may employ persons in this state who are not licensed in this state, but those persons shall not render any professional services rendered or to be rendered by the corporation in this state.

(c) Nothing in this section or in this part is intended to, or shall, augment, diminish or otherwise alter existing provisions of law, statutes or court rules relating to services by a California attorney in another jurisdiction, or services by an out-of-state attorney in California. These existing provisions, including, but not limited to, admission pro hac vice and the taking of depositions in a jurisdiction other than the one in which the deposing attorney is admitted to practice, shall remain in full force and effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 910, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13406.

(a) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), shares of capital stock in a professional corporation may be issued only to a licensed person or to a person who is licensed to render the same professional services in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the person practices, and any shares issued in violation of this restriction shall be void. Unless there is a public offering of securities by a professional corporation or by a foreign professional corporation in this state, its financial statements shall be treated by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation as confidential, except to the extent that such statements shall be subject to subpoena in connection with any judicial or administrative proceeding, and may be admissible in evidence therein. A shareholder of a professional corporation or of a foreign
 professional corporation qualified to render professional services in this state shall not enter into a voting trust, proxy, or any other arrangement vesting another person (other than another person who is a shareholder of the same corporation) with the authority to exercise the voting power of any or all of the shareholder’s shares, and any purported voting trust, proxy, or other arrangement shall be void.

(b) A professional law corporation may be incorporated as a nonprofit public benefit corporation under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The corporation is a qualified legal services project or a qualified support center within the meaning of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The professional law
 corporation otherwise meets all of the requirements and complies with all of the provisions of the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, as well as all of the following requirements:

(A) All of the members of the corporation, if it is a membership organization as described in the Nonprofit Corporation Law, are persons licensed to practice law in California.

(B) All of the members of the professional law corporation’s board of directors are persons licensed to practice law in California.

(C) Seventy percent of the clients to whom the corporation provides legal services are lower income persons as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and to other persons who would not otherwise have access to legal services.

(D) The corporation
 shall not enter into contingency fee contracts with clients.

(c) A professional law corporation incorporated as a nonprofit public benefit corporation that is a recipient in good standing as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code shall be deemed to have satisfied all of the filing requirements of a professional law corporation under Sections 6161.1, 6162, and 6163 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 62.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13407.
